Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.903

Serving on board, committee, or commission not prevented.

Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to prevent a member of a board, committee, advisory commission, or other body required or permitted by statute to be appointed from any identifiable group or interest, from serving on such body in accordance with the intent of the legislature in establishing such body.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 234 s 33. Formerly RCW 42.18.330.]